Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB117.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 635.7 of the act of May 17, 1921 (P.L.682, No.284), known as The Insurance Company Law of 1921, is amended by adding a subsection to read:Section 635.7. Billing.--* * *(b.1) An insurer that sends a reimbursement payment directly by mail to a covered person for medically necessary emergency medical services provided by a nonnetwork EMS agency shall include a notice explaining the purpose of the payment. This notice shall:1234567891011121314151617181920212223 (1) Clearly and conspicuously state the following:(i) The services for which the payment is being made, including the date of service and the name of the EMS agency that provided emergency medical services.(ii) The covered person is responsible for the bill for emergency medical services provided by the EMS agency.(iii) If the covered person has already paid the bill for the emergency medical services provided by the EMS agency in full, they can cash or deposit the reimbursement payment.(iv) The covered person has the option to discuss or negotiate the bill for emergency medical services with the EMS agency prior to making or forwarding a payment. The covered person will not pay the EMS agency less than the amount the covered person received from the insurer for that service.(v) Whether any payment, including the amount, has been made by the insurer to the EMS agency related to this service.(vi) Any copayment, coinsurance or deductible that is the responsibility of the covered person under the covered person's health insurance policy.(2) Disclose the information required under paragraph (1) in type of a size no less than that of the surrounding text and in no less than a font size of ten points.(3) Be printed on a separate page.(4) Be printed on red colored paper.(5) Include a heading, conspicuously placed at the top of the notice, with the words "STOP" in at least twenty-four-point, boldface type and "Read this notice before depositing payment" in at least eighteen-point, boldface type.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 120 days.20250HB0117PN0095 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930